Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.170

Effective date of certain agreements—Increased benefits during agreement authorized, when.

(1) Whenever a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee organization representing the same employees, the effective date of such collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with such effective date as established by this subsection, and may also accrue beginning with the effective date of any individual employee contracts affected thereby.

(2) Any collective bargaining agreement may provide for the increase of any wages, salaries and other benefits during the term of such agreement or the term of any individual employee contracts concerned, in the event that the employer receives by increased appropriation or from other sources, additional moneys for such purposes.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 18.]